Hawaii statutes.
[§663-42] Subrogation claims denied.
There shall be no recovery for any subrogation claim pursuant to any
subrogation clause of an uninsured, underinsured, collision, or other
first-party coverage as a result of payments made to persons who have claims that
arise in whole or in part under this part. [L 2003, c 69, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next